District of Columbia statutes.
31-3932.03

Application of subchapter I of this chapter.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided, §§ 31-3931.03, 31-3931.04, 31-3931.05, 31-3931.09, 31-3931.10, 31-3931.11, 31-3931.12, 31-3931.13, 31-3931.14, 31-3931.15, 31-3931.16, 31-3931.17, 31-3931.18, 31-3931.19, 31-3931.20, 31-3931.21, and 31-3931.09 through 31-3931.22 shall apply under this subchapter to SPFCs.

(b)

The Commissioner, by rule or order, may exempt an SPFC, on a case-by-case basis, from the provisions of this title that the Commissioner determines to be inappropriate given the nature of the risks to be insured.

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 203
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-285, § 2(b), 54 DCR 944
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 165(a), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (a).